test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-IPFV_REP-0-itsiy_cry.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - itsiy[cry] :
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg1:       náschish
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg2:       nánichish
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg3:       náchish
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl1:       [náasiìchish, náasaàchish]
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl1+Distr: [nádààsiìchish, nádààsaàchish]
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl2:       náschish
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl2+Distr: nádàschish
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl3:       nágichish
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl3+Distr: nádàgichish
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg4:       náts'ichish
    itsiy[cry]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg4+Distr: nádàts'ichish
